Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION

SUBTITLE C. WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE FOR CERTAIN GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 504. WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE FOR EMPLOYEES OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 504.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Division" means the division of workers' compensation of the Texas Department of Insurance.

(2) "Employee" means:

(A) a person in the service of a political subdivision who has been employed as provided by law; or

(B) a person for whom optional coverage is provided under Section 504.012 or 504.013.

(3) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, special district, school district, junior college district, housing authority, community center established under Subchapter A, Chapter 534, Health and Safety Code, or any other legally constituted political subdivision of the state.

(4) "Pool" means two or more political subdivisions collectively self-insuring under an interlocal contract under Chapter 791, Government Code.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.318, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 9.04, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.002. APPLICATION OF GENERAL WORKERS' COMPENSATION LAWS; LIMIT ON ACTIONS AND DAMAGES. (a) The following provisions of Subtitles A and B apply to and are included in this chapter except to the extent that they are inconsistent with this chapter:

(1) Chapter 401, other than Section 401.011(18) defining "employer" and Section 401.012 defining "employee";

(2) Chapter 402;

(3) Chapter 403, other than Sections 403.001-403.005;

(4) Chapters 404 and 405;

(5) Sections 406.006-406.009 and Subchapters B and D-G, Chapter 406, other than Sections 406.033, 406.034, 406.035, 406.091, and 406.096;

(6) Chapter 408, other than Sections 408.001(b) and (c);

(7) Chapters 409-412;

(8) Chapter 413, except as provided by Section 504.053;

(9) Chapters 414-417; and

(10) Chapter 451, subject to the limitations of Subsection (a-1).

(a-1) The liability of a political subdivision under Chapter 451 is limited to money damages in a maximum amount of $100,000 for each person aggrieved by and $300,000 for each single occurrence of a violation of that chapter. For purposes of this subsection, a single occurrence is considered to be a single employment policy or employment action that results in discrimination against or discharge of one or more employees concurrently.

(b) For the purpose of applying the provisions listed by Subsection (a) to this chapter, "employer" means "political subdivision."

(c) Neither this chapter nor Subtitle A authorizes a cause of action or damages against a political subdivision or an employee of a political subdivision beyond the actions and damages authorized by Chapter 101, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(d) For the purpose of applying the provisions listed by Subsection (a), "written notice" to a political subdivision that self-insures, either individually or collectively through an interlocal agreement as described by Section 504.011, occurs only on written notice to the intergovernmental risk pool or other entity responsible for administering the claim.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 954, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 939, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.319, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 810 (H.B. 451), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.003. ELECTION OF REMEDIES. A person may not bring an action for wrongful discharge under both Chapter 451 and Chapter 554, Government Code.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(77), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. COVERAGE

Sec. 504.011. METHOD OF PROVIDING COVERAGE. A political subdivision shall extend workers' compensation benefits to its employees by:

(1) becoming a self-insurer;

(2) providing insurance under a workers' compensation insurance policy; or

(3) entering into an interlocal agreement with other political subdivisions providing for self-insurance.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 504.012. OPTIONAL COVERAGES. (a) A political subdivision may cover volunteer fire fighters, police officers, emergency medical personnel, and other volunteers that are specifically named. A person covered under this subsection is entitled to full medical benefits and the minimum compensation payments under the law. Notwithstanding any other law, the governing body of the political subdivision may elect to provide compensation payments to a person covered under this subsection that are greater than the minimum benefits provided under this title.

(b) By majority vote of the members of the governing body of a political subdivision, the political subdivision may cover as employees:

(1) an elected official;

(2) persons paid for jury service; or

(3) persons paid for service in the conduct of an election.

(c) A political subdivision may cover a child who is in a program established by the political subdivision to assist children in rendering personal services to a charitable or educational institution under Section 54.041(b), Family Code.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1426, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 504.013. COVERAGE FOR TRUSTEES AND STAFF OF SELF-INSURANCE FUND. By majority vote of the board of trustees of a self-insurance fund created under this chapter, the fund may cover:

(1) members of the board of trustees;

(2) staff of the fund, including persons with whom the fund has contracted to perform staff functions; or

(3) any other self-insurance fund created under Chapter 791, Government Code.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 504.014. EXCLUSIONS. A person is not an employee and is not entitled to compensation under this chapter if the person:

(1) is in the service of a political subdivision and is paid on a piecework basis or on a basis other than by the hour, day, week, month, or year;

(2) is a patient or client of a political subdivision involved in vocational training;

(3) is a prisoner incarcerated by a political subdivision; or

(4) performs services that may benefit a political subdivision, or is employed by or under contract with a performer providing those services, but does not receive payment from the political subdivision for the performance of the services, if the services are performed in connection with the operation or production of:

(A) a stock show;

(B) a rodeo;

(C) a carnival;

(D) a circus;

(E) a musical, vocal, or theatrical performance;

(F) a professional baseball league or game;

(G) a professional hockey league or game;

(H) a wrestling event or match;

(I) a vehicle or motorcycle event; or

(J) another entertainment event.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 841, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.015. MUNICIPAL UTILITIES. (a) This section applies to a municipal utility operated by a board of trustees established under Section 1502.070, Government Code, or a similar law.

(b) The board of trustees of a utility has the authority of the governing body of the municipality under this chapter to:

(1) adopt a self-insurance program or take out a policy of workers' compensation insurance; and

(2) adopt resolutions, give notices, and do all things concerning workers' compensation regarding the utility's employees that the governing body of the municipality would be authorized to do regarding other municipal employees or groups of employees.

(c) Funds set aside or spent for the purpose of workers' compensation insurance are considered operating expenses of the utility. Funds set aside or paid by the board of trustees for self-insurance or for premiums on insurance policies shall be paid out of utility revenues. A provision for self-insurance or an obligation incurred under an insurance policy is not a general liability of the municipality but is payable only out of utility revenues.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.282, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 504.016. JOINT INSURANCE FUND. (a) Two or more political subdivisions may establish a joint insurance fund as provided by this section.

(b) A political subdivision may pay into the fund its proportionate part as due and may contract for the fund, by and through its directors, to make the payments due under this chapter to employees of the political subdivision.

(c) The fund may be operated under the rules and bylaws established by the participating political subdivisions.

(d) A joint insurance fund created under this section may provide to the Texas Department of Insurance loss data in the same manner as an insurance company writing workers' compensation insurance. The State Board of Insurance shall use the loss data as provided by Subchapter D, Chapter 5, Insurance Code.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a joint insurance fund created under this section is not considered insurance for purposes of any state statute and is not subject to State Board of Insurance rules.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 504.017. FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDED TRANSPORTATION ENTITIES. An entity is eligible to participate under Section 504.016 or Chapter 791 or 2259, Government Code, if the entity provides transportation subsidized in whole or in part by and provided to clients of:

(1) the Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services;

(2) the Department of State Health Services;

(3) the Cancer Prevention and Research Institute of Texas;

(4) the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs;

(5) the Health and Human Services Commission;

(6) the Department of Aging and Disability Services; or

(7) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 266 (H.B. 14), Sec. 5, eff. November 6, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 138, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.018. NOTICE TO DIVISION AND EMPLOYEES; EFFECT ON COMMON-LAW OR STATUTORY LIABILITY. (a) A political subdivision shall notify the division of the method by which its employees will receive benefits, the approximate number of employees covered, and the estimated amount of payroll.

(b) A political subdivision shall notify its employees of the method by which the employees will receive benefits and the effective date of the coverage. Employees of a political subdivision are conclusively considered to have accepted the compensation provisions instead of common-law or statutory liability or cause of action, if any, for injuries received in the course of employment or death resulting from injuries received in the course of employment.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.320, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.321, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 504.019. COVERAGE FOR POST-TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER FOR CERTAIN FIRST RESPONDERS. (a) In this section:

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(1) "First responder" means an individual employed by a political subdivision of this state who is:

(A) a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(B) a person licensed under Chapter 773, Health and Safety Code, as an emergency care attendant, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, or licensed paramedic; or

(C) a firefighter subject to certification by the Texas Commission on Fire Protection under Chapter 419, Government Code, whose principal duties are firefighting and aircraft crash and rescue.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(1) "First responder" means an individual employed by a political subdivision of this state who is:

(A) a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(B) a person licensed under Chapter 773, Health and Safety Code, as an emergency care attendant, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, or licensed paramedic; or

(C) a firefighter subject to certification by the Texas Commission on Fire Protection under Chapter 419, Government Code, whose principal duties are firefighting and aircraft crash and rescue.

(2) "Post-traumatic stress disorder" means a disorder that meets the diagnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder specified by the American Psychiatric Association in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, fifth edition, or a later edition adopted by the commissioner of workers' compensation.

(b) Post-traumatic stress disorder suffered by a first responder is a compensable injury under this subtitle only if it is based on a diagnosis that:

(1) the disorder is caused by one or more events occurring in the course and scope of the first responder's employment; and

(2) the preponderance of the evidence indicates that the event or events were a producing cause of the disorder.

(c) For purposes of this subtitle, the date of injury for post-traumatic stress disorder suffered by a first responder is the date on which the first responder first knew or should have known that the disorder may be related to the first responder's employment.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1983), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1101 (H.B. 2143), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.131, eff. January 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER C. BENEFITS AND OFFSETS

Sec. 504.051. OFFSET AGAINST PAYMENTS FOR INCAPACITY. (a) Benefits provided under this chapter shall be offset:

(1) to the extent applicable, by any amount for incapacity received as provided by:

(A) Chapter 143 or 177A, Local Government Code; or

(B) any other statute in effect on June 19, 1975, that provides for the payment for incapacity to work because of injury on the job that is also covered by this chapter; and

(2) by any amount paid under Article III, Section 52e, of the Texas Constitution, as added in 1967.

(b) If benefits are offset, the employer may not withhold the offset portion of the employee's wages until the time that benefits under this chapter are received.

(c) If an employee's wages are offset, the employee and employer shall contribute to the pension fund on the amount of money by which the employee's wages were offset. An employee's pension benefit may not be reduced as a result of the employee's injuries or any compensation received under this chapter unless the reduction results from a pension revision passed by a majority vote of the affected members of a pension system.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 665 (H.B. 471), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2023.

Sec. 504.052. SICK LEAVE BENEFITS. (a) The governing body of a political subdivision, by majority vote, may provide that while an employee of the political subdivision is receiving benefits under this chapter, the employee may elect to receive previously accrued sick leave benefits, whether statutory or contractual, in an amount equal to the difference between the benefits under this chapter and the weekly compensation that the employee was receiving before the injury that resulted in the claim.

(b) Sick leave benefits received under Subsection (a) shall be deducted proportionately from the employee's sick leave balance.

(c) This section does not limit the medical benefits to be paid to the employee. A sick leave plan may not require an employee to take sick leave benefits before receiving benefits under this chapter.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 504.053. ELECTION. (a) A political subdivision that self-insures either individually or collectively shall provide workers' compensation medical benefits to the injured employees of the political subdivision through a workers' compensation health care network certified under Chapter 1305, Insurance Code, if the governing body of the political subdivision determines that provision of those benefits through a network is available to the employees and practical for the political subdivision. A political subdivision may enter into interlocal agreements and other agreements with other political subdivisions to establish or contract with networks under this section.

(b) If a political subdivision or a pool determines that a workers' compensation health care network certified under Chapter 1305, Insurance Code, is not available or practical for the political subdivision or pool, the political subdivision or pool may provide medical benefits to its injured employees or to the injured employees of the members of the pool:

(1) in the manner provided by Chapter 408, other than Sections 408.001(b) and (c) and Section 408.002, and by Subchapters B and C, Chapter 413; or

(2) by directly contracting with health care providers or by contracting through a health benefits pool established under Chapter 172, Local Government Code.

(c) If the political subdivision or pool provides medical benefits in the manner authorized under Subsection (b)(2), the following do not apply:

(1) Sections 408.004 and 408.0041, unless use of a required medical examination or designated doctor is necessary to resolve an issue relating to the entitlement to or amount of income benefits under this title;

(2) Subchapter B, Chapter 408, except for Section 408.021;

(3) Chapter 413, except for Section 413.042; and

(4) Chapter 1305, Insurance Code, except for Sections 1305.501, 1305.502, and 1305.503.

(d) If the political subdivision or pool provides medical benefits in the manner authorized under Subsection (b)(2), the following standards apply:

(1) the political subdivision or pool must ensure that workers' compensation medical benefits are reasonably available to all injured workers of the political subdivision or the injured workers of the members of the pool within a designed service area;

(2) the political subdivision or pool must ensure that all necessary health care services are provided in a manner that will ensure the availability of and accessibility to adequate health care providers, specialty care, and facilities;

(3) the political subdivision or pool must have an internal review process for resolving complaints relating to the manner of providing medical benefits, including an appeal to the governing body or its designee and appeal to an independent review organization;

(4) the political subdivision or pool must establish reasonable procedures for the transition of injured workers to contract providers and for the continuity of treatment, including notice of impending termination of providers and a current list of contract providers;

(5) the political subdivision or pool shall provide for emergency care if an injured worker cannot reasonably reach a contract provider and the care is for medical screening or other evaluation that is necessary to determine whether a medical emergency condition exists, necessary emergency care services including treatment and stabilization, and services originating in a hospital emergency facility following treatment or stabilization of an emergency medical condition;

(6) prospective or concurrent review of the medical necessity and appropriateness of health care services must comply with Article 21.58A, Insurance Code;

(7) the political subdivision or pool shall continue to report data to the appropriate agency as required by Title 5 of this code and Chapter 1305, Insurance Code; and

(8) a political subdivision or pool is subject to the requirements under Sections 1305.501, 1305.502, and 1305.503, Insurance Code.

(e) Nothing in this chapter waives sovereign immunity or creates a new cause of action, except that a political subdivision that self-insures either individually or collectively is liable for:

(1) sanctions, administrative penalties, and other remedies authorized under Chapter 415;

(2) attorney's fees as provided by Section 408.221(c); and

(3) attorney's fees as provided by Section 417.003.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.322, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 310 (S.B. 877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 701 (S.B. 2551), Sec. 6, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 504.054. CONTESTED CASE HEARING ON AND JUDICIAL REVIEW OF INDEPENDENT REVIEW. (a) A party to a medical dispute that remains unresolved after the review described by Section 504.053(d)(3) is entitled to a contested case hearing. A hearing under this subsection shall be conducted by the division in the same manner as a hearing conducted under Section 413.0311.

(b) The administrative law judge conducting the contested case hearing under Subsection (a) shall consider any treatment guidelines adopted by the political subdivision or pool that provides medical benefits under Section 504.053(b)(2) if those guidelines meet the standards provided by Section 413.011(e).

(c) A party that has exhausted all administrative remedies under Subsection (a) and is aggrieved by a final decision of the division may seek judicial review of the decision.

(d) Judicial review under Subsection (c) shall be conducted in the manner provided for judicial review of a contested case under Subchapter G, Chapter 2001, Government Code, and is governed by the substantial evidence rule.

(e) A decision of the independent review organization is binding during the pendency of a dispute.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (H.B. 2605), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 839 (H.B. 2111), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.055. EXPEDITED PROVISION OF MEDICAL BENEFITS FOR CERTAIN INJURIES SUSTAINED BY FIRST RESPONDER IN COURSE AND SCOPE OF EMPLOYMENT.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) In this section, "first responder" means:

(1) an individual employed by a political subdivision of this state who is:

(A) a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(B) a person licensed under Chapter 773, Health and Safety Code, as an emergency care attendant, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, or licensed paramedic; or

(C) a firefighter subject to certification by the Texas Commission on Fire Protection under Chapter 419, Government Code, whose principal duties are firefighting and aircraft crash and rescue; or

(2) an individual covered under Section 504.012(a) who is providing volunteer services to a political subdivision of this state as:

(A) a volunteer firefighter, without regard to whether the volunteer firefighter is certified under Subchapter D, Chapter 419, Government Code; or

(B) an emergency medical services volunteer, as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) In this section, "first responder" means:

(1) an individual employed by a political subdivision of this state who is:

(A) a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(B) a person licensed under Chapter 773, Health and Safety Code, as an emergency care attendant, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, or licensed paramedic; or

(C) a firefighter subject to certification by the Texas Commission on Fire Protection under Chapter 419, Government Code, whose principal duties are firefighting and aircraft crash and rescue; or

(2) an individual covered under Section 504.012(a) who is providing volunteer services to a political subdivision of this state as:

(A) a volunteer firefighter, without regard to whether the volunteer firefighter is certified under Subchapter D, Chapter 419, Government Code; or

(B) an emergency medical services volunteer, as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code.

(b) This section applies only to a first responder who sustains a serious bodily injury, as defined by Section 1.07, Penal Code, in the course and scope of employment. For purposes of this section, an injury sustained in the course and scope of employment includes an injury sustained by a first responder providing services on a volunteer basis.

(c) The political subdivision, division, and insurance carrier shall accelerate and give priority to an injured first responder's claim for medical benefits, including all health care required to cure or relieve the effects naturally resulting from a compensable injury described by Subsection (b).

(d) The division shall accelerate, under rules adopted by the commissioner of workers' compensation, a contested case hearing requested by or an appeal submitted by a first responder regarding the denial of a claim for medical benefits, including all health care required to cure or relieve the effects naturally resulting from a compensable injury described by Subsection (b). The first responder shall provide notice to the division and independent review organization that the contested case or appeal involves a first responder.

(e) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a first responder is entitled to review of a medical dispute in the manner provided by Section 504.054.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (H.B. 2605), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.132, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 504.056. INTENT OF EXPEDITED PROVISION OF MEDICAL BENEFITS FOR CERTAIN INJURIES SUSTAINED BY FIRST RESPONDER IN COURSE AND SCOPE OF EMPLOYMENT. The purpose of Section 504.055 is to ensure that an injured first responder's claim for medical benefits is accelerated by a political subdivision, insurance carrier, and the division to the full extent authorized by current law.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (H.B. 2605), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 504.071. RULES; FORMS. A political subdivision may:

(1) adopt and publish rules and prescribe and furnish forms necessary to effectively administer this chapter; and

(2) adopt and enforce necessary rules for the prevention of accidents and injuries.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 504.072. APPROPRIATIONS FOR DISBURSEMENTS; ACCOUNT; REPORT. (a) A political subdivision may set aside from available appropriations, other than itemized salary appropriations, an amount sufficient to pay all costs, administrative expenses, benefits, insurance, and attorney's fees authorized by this chapter.

(b) The amount set aside under Subsection (a) shall be set up in a separate account in the political subdivision's records showing the disbursements authorized by this chapter. A statement of the amount set aside for disbursements from the account shall be included in an annual report made to the political subdivision's governing body and its treasurer.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 504.073. REPRESENTATION IN LEGAL PROCEEDINGS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), in a proceeding in connection with workers' compensation benefits provided by a political subdivision as a self-insurer, the political subdivision may be represented by:

(1) the political subdivision's attorney or that attorney's assistants; or

(2) outside counsel.

(b) In a proceeding involving workers' compensation for employees of a municipal utility operated by a board of trustees established under Section 1502.070, Government Code, or a similar law, if the board of trustees is a self-insurer, the municipality shall be represented by the regularly employed attorney or outside counsel of the board of trustees.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.284, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 504.074. SELF-INSURANCE ACCOUNT FOR DEATH BENEFITS AND LIFETIME INCOME BENEFITS. (a) A pool or a political subdivision that self-insures may establish an account for the payment of death benefits and lifetime income benefits under Chapter 408.

(b) An account established under this section may accumulate assets in an amount that the pool or political subdivision, in its sole discretion, determines is necessary in order to pay death benefits and lifetime income benefits. The establishment of an account under this section or the amount of assets accumulated in the account does not affect the liability of a pool or political subdivision for the payment of death benefits and lifetime income benefits.

(c) Chapter 2256, Government Code, does not apply to the investment of assets in an account established under this section. A pool or political subdivision investing or reinvesting the assets of an account shall discharge its duties solely in the interest of current and future beneficiaries:

(1) for the exclusive purposes of:

(A) providing death benefits and lifetime income benefits to current and future beneficiaries; and

(B) defraying reasonable expenses of administering the account;

(2) with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the prevailing circumstances that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with matters of the type would use in the conduct of an enterprise with a like character and like aims;

(3) by diversifying the investments of the account to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so; and

(4) in accordance with the documents and instruments governing the account to the extent that the documents and instruments are consistent with this section.

(d) In choosing and contracting for professional investment management services for an account established under this section and in continuing the use of an investment manager, the pool or political subdivision must act prudently and in the interest of the current and future beneficiaries of the account.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 701 (S.B. 2551), Sec. 7, eff. June 10, 2019.